Hawaii, session 2026, SB2147.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that all libraries, including public libraries, school libraries, and higher education libraries, are essential for the public good.  Libraries are vital community anchors that promote lifelong learning, equity, civic engagement, and access to information and culture.  In Hawaii, libraries serve as inclusive and safe gathering spaces for residents of all ages, backgrounds, and abilities.  As trusted institutions rooted in the community, libraries uphold the democratic ideal that knowledge should be freely available to all, and that every person deserves access to the tools that are necessary for educational, personal, and professional growth. The legislature further finds that Hawaii's public library system, the only statewide public library system in the United States, has been a cherished part of the State's educational and cultural fabric for over a century.  Across the State, libraries offer more than books; they provide access to computers and broadband, host cultural programming, support students and families, foster early literacy, serve kupuna and veterans, and provide job-seeking resources and business information.  Many residents, especially those in rural, underserved, or low-income communities, depend on libraries for access to essential services that promote upward mobility and civic inclusion. The legislature acknowledges the vital role libraries play in fostering civic engagement across the United States.  According to the American Library Association, roughly ninety per cent of public libraries help patrons access government services such as voter registration, tax forms, and social assistance programs.  Additionally, close to eighty per cent of libraries provide a meeting space for community organizations and civic discussions, serving as a trusted, neutral hub for public dialogue.  Moreover, libraries offer critical services that foster civic engagement, empowering citizens to think critically and participate in the country's democracy. The legislature recognizes that in the digital age, libraries have not become obsolete but have become even more essential.  According to the American Library Association, seventy-six per cent of Americans reported visiting a library in the past year, totaling over 1,300,000,000 visits.  Furthermore, Americans utilize and visit public libraries, school libraries, and higher education libraries fifty per cent more than they go to the movies.  These statistics highlight how librarians work tirelessly to adapt to changing technologies, meet the evolving needs of the public, and support educational institutions from preschool to postsecondary.  In times of crisis, such as natural disasters or public health emergencies, libraries have also functioned as resilience hubs by providing aid, information, and community support. The legislature additionally finds that school libraries and higher education libraries play a pivotal role in education and prepare the State's youth for the future, empowering them to be the best and brightest in society.  Numerous research studies have demonstrated that students in schools with school librarians have better outcomes.  A 2023 study found that North Carolina students with a full-time school librarian scored significantly higher on reading and math than similar students who did not have a full-time librarian.  Furthermore, a 2007 study in Indiana demonstrated improved test scores for elementary, middle, and high school students when increased collaboration took place between classroom teachers and school librarians.  These statistics underscore an important truth in the education system that proves students and schools perform better when there is active collaboration with librarians and libraries. Moreover, the legislature believes that public awareness and appreciation for libraries must be cultivated to ensure their continued strength and sustainability.  Designating a "Love My Library Day" will not only encourage individuals and families to visit their local libraries but will also offer an opportunity for communities to celebrate the many ways libraries enrich their lives.  Designating a "Love My Library Day" will also serve as a call to action, highlighting the need for ongoing investment, volunteerism, and public support to sustain and expand library services for future generations. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to designate the first Friday in February of each year as "Love My Library Day" in the State to honor the essential role that libraries and library workers play in strengthening our communities, expanding access to knowledge, and promoting lifelong learning and aloha across Hawaii. SECTION 2.  Chapter 8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§8-     Love My Library Day.  The first Friday in February of each year shall be known and designated as "Love My Library Day".  This day is not and shall not be construed to be a state holiday." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________